Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-212
Petitions; signatures; verification.

All petitions provided for in sections 14-204, 14-210, and 14-211 shall be signed by none but legal voters of the city and each petition shall contain, in addition to the names of the petitioners, the street and house number where the petitioner resides. The signatures to such petition need not all be appended to one paper, and at least one of the signatories of each paper shall make oath before some officer, competent to administer oaths, that the statements made in any such petition are true as he or she verily believes, and that the signatories were, at the time of signing such petition, legal voters of the city as he or she verily believes. He or she shall also state in the affidavit the number of signatories upon the petition, or part thereof, sworn to by him or her, at the time he or she makes such affidavit.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 12, p. 427;

C.S.1922, § 3537;

C.S.1929, § 14-212;

R.S.1943, § 14-212;

Laws 1984, LB 975, § 9.